Maryland, session 2025, SB0252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.5–404.
(a) The State Board shall adopt rules and regulations for licensing and operating
child care centers.
(b) These rules and regulations shall:
(1) Ensure safe and sanitary conditions in child care centers;
(2) Ensure proper care, protection, and supervision of children in child care
centers;
(3) Ensure the health of children in child care centers by:
(i) Monitoring children for signs and symptoms of child abuse;
– 1 –

Ch. 318 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Instructing licensees and staff concerning child abuse detection
and reporting;
(iii) Monitoring health practices to help prevent the spread of disease;
(iv) Monitoring the care of infants and children with special needs;
and
(v) Prohibiting the administration of corporal punishment to
discipline a child;
(4) Promote the sound growth and development of children in child care
centers;
(5) Promote proper nutrition and developmentally appropriate practices
by:
(i) Establishing training and policies promoting breast–feeding;
(ii) 1. Requiring compliance with the United States Department
of Agriculture Child and Adult Care Food Program standards for beverages served to
children, except that milk that is not nonfat or low fat may be ordered by a health care
practitioner or requested by a parent or guardian; and
2. Prohibiting beverages other than infant formula that
contain added sweetener or caffeine; and
(iii) Setting limits on screen time;
(6) Carry out otherwise the purposes and requirements of this subtitle,
including imposition of intermediate sanctions to ensure compliance;
(7) Prohibit a child from remaining at a child care center for more than 14
hours in 1 day unless the Department issues an exception for that child based on guidelines
set by the State Superintendent;
(8) [(i)] Require that a child care center have in attendance at all times
at least 1 individual who is responsible for supervision of children, including children on
field trips, and who holds a current certificate indicating successful completion of approved:
[1.] (I) Basic first aid training through the American Red Cross
or through a program with equivalent standards; and
[2.] (II) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training through
the American Heart Association or through a program with equivalent standards
appropriate for the ages of children for whom care is provided in the child care center; [and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 318
(ii) Require that a child care center serving more than 20 children
have in attendance certificate holders described in item (i) of this item in a ratio of at least
1 certificate holder for every 20 children CERTIFICATE HOLDERS TO CHILDREN SET BY
THE DEPARTMENT;]
(9) Require that the minimum age of a child care teacher in a child care
center be at least 18 years old and an individual may not be precluded from being a child
care teacher solely for being 18 years old;
(10) (i) Require that a child care center that receives notice of a
contaminated drinking water supply from the child care center’s supplier of water, in
accordance with § 9–410 of the Environment Article or otherwise, send notice of the
drinking water contamination to the parent or legal guardian of each child attending the
child care center; and
(ii) Require that the notice sent by the child care center shall:
1. Be sent within 10 business days after receipt of the notice
of contamination from the child care center’s water supplier;
2. Be in writing;
3. Identify the contaminants and their levels in the center’s
water supply; and
4. Describe the child care center’s plan for dealing with the
water contamination problem until the child care center’s water is determined by the
appropriate authority to be safe for consumption;
(11) (i) Require a child care center to have a written emergency
preparedness plan for emergency situations that require evacuation, sheltering in place, or
other protection of children, such as in the event of fire, natural disaster, or other
threatening situation that may pose a health or safety hazard to the children in the child
care center;
(ii) Require the plan under item (i) of this item to include:
1. A designated relocation site and evacuation route;
2. Procedures for notifying parents or other adults
responsible for the child of the relocation;
3. Procedures to address the needs of individual children,
including children with special needs;
– 3 –

Ch. 318 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. Procedures for the reassignment of staff duties during an
emergency, as appropriate; and
5. Procedures for communicating with local emergency
management officials or other appropriate State or local authorities; and
(iii) Require a child care center to train staff and ensure that staff are
familiar with the plan;
(12) Require a child care center to have window coverings in accordance with
§ 5–505 of the Family Law Article; and
(13) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, establish probationary
employment qualifications for an individual who is applying for the first time to be a child
care teacher in a child care center in the State that serves preschool or school–age children
who are at least 3 years old.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –